lib/dict/bs_BA.dic
Ande/Q
antimon/H
autobus/L
avgust/H
bandera/T
Baranja/R
barica/P
bazalt/H
beskonaènost/S
bespredmetnost/J
biè/M
Bihaæ/K
bitke/Q
biznismen/L
Bjelave/Q
bog/G
Borik/H
Borike/Q
Braè/K
Brajev/V
branjevina/P
brbljanje/O
brbljivost/R
brigada/T
broj/M
brojaè/N
buð/J
Bursaæ/K
Cazin/H
centarhalf/G
cilj/M
èað/J
èak¹ire/Q
èast/J
èavli/P
èetvrt/J
Èije/H
èistota/T
èitljiv/V
èunj/M
æelija/S
æerpiè/N
Æosiæ/K
æuliti/F
dah/G
daire/Q
damast/L
darovanje/U
davnina/P
decembar/R
Delnice/Q
demontiranje/O
divljaè/J
dokon/V
dolina/P
dopu¹tenost/S
doseg/T
Dositej/K
dozvoliti/F
Dragoljub/H
dramatièar/N
dug/G
du¾/J
dvojica/R
Ðilas/H
Ðurðevdan/L
epohe/Q
esencija/S
evakuacija/P
Ezop/H
fiksiranje/O
financije/Q
finesa/T
font/G
ga¹enje/U
gavran/L
glad/J
Glamoè/K
glupost/R
gnoj/M
gnjev/H
gol/V
golub/G
grablje/Q
gramatièar/N
granica/P
Griè/K
Gru¾/K
guba/T
Harvard/H
herojstvo/S
hlaèe/Q
hod/G
humaniziranje/O
Igman/H
ihtiol/L
ime/P
inè/N
Indonezija/R
iscrpiti/F
ishranjenost/S
iskorjenjivanje/U
ispa¹a/T
ispovijed/J
istinit/V
isuèem/F
izbijanje/O
izmak/H
izmirenje/U
izoblièiti/F
izraðevina/P
izumitelj/N
izvoz/L
jednakost/R
Jernej/K
jesen/I
Jesenice/Q
je¾/M
jogunast/V
jugozapad/H
kaji¹/M
karikatura/T
Karpati/P
kelj/M
kiè/K
kist/G
klaðenje/U
klate¾/I
klimaks/L
klizaè/N
kloniti/F
koko¹/I
kolekcija/S
kolomaz/J
komuniciranje/O
konceptualizacija/P
konzerva/T
Kopenhagen/H
koralj/N
ko¹/M
Koviljaèa/R
krak/G
kralj/M
Kranj/K
kreator/L
kritika/P
kroj/M
krstitelj/N
kr¹enje/S
kr¾ljav/V
kuniæ/T
kupelj/J
kurs/M
kvarc/K
lav/G
la¾/J
lijepljenje/U
loj/M
lo¹/W
Lovæen/H
Lusaka/R
lutanje/O
ljekar/N
lje¹njak/T
ljut/V
ljutiæ/J
logora¹/K
lokalan/J
lumpovanje/Q
maestral/L
mafija¹/I
maj/K
makaron/J
maloljetnik/P
maloljetnost/R
mamiti/F
maneken/G
mar¹/M
mast/I
meða¹/N
Meðimurje/S
meðurezultat/T
menuet/H
Milivoj/K
minulost/R
mjesec/L
moæ/J
moj/W
mrijest/G
muèaljiv/V
mulj/M
naæve/Q
nadnièarka/T
nadzornik/P
naglasiti/F
naklapanje/O
namje¹taj/N
namje¹tenje/U
naplatak/R
naseliti/F
na¹/W
natjeèaj/L
nazivanje/Q
neadekvatnost/S
Nehru/H
neiscrpljiv/V
nemoæ/J
nepopravljiv/V
nesaglediv/V
nespokojstvo/S
nezamisliv/V
Nigerija/R
Ni¹/K
noge/Q
obdani¹te/T
obilje¾avanje/U
obilje¾iti/F
obitelj/J
obrezivaè/N
obruè/M
oèajanje/O
odnositi/F
odobravanje/U
odvratnost/S
oklop/L
okolina/P
oku¹ati/F
opæenitost/R
oplemenjivaè/N
opor/V
opremanje/O
opticaj/K
osakaæivanje/U
ospice/Q
ostajati/F
ovca/T
ovjerovljenje/U
o¾eniti/F
Pakistan/H
Pakrac/K
pantalone/Q
papagaj/N
paradoks/L
patrijar¹ija/S
pauziranje/O
peæ/J
pedijatar/P
pediker/M
peptidaza/W
percepcijski/I
pernica/I
pest/J
pilence/W
pingvin/I
pipeta/I
pirat/T
pjenu¹av/W
pjevljivost/R
pjevni/I
plac/M
plah/V
plamenik/I
planer/W
plastenik/I
pla¹t/G
platnar/L
Plitvice/Q
plivaè/N
plodou¾ivanje/I
Plzenj/K
pobacivanje/U
podstanar/I
podudaranje/O
pogospoditi/F
pojednostavljenje/U
pokretaè/N
pokroviteljstvo/S
polarizator/I
polipropilen/W
politeist/T
politika/P
polubrat/H
polugol/V
polukrug/G
poluvodiè/I
ponoæ/J
Portoro¾/K
Portugalija/R
pospje¹iti/F
posramljenost/I
posredovanje/U
posrtanje/O
postav/W
postskriptum/I
posudica/M
posvjedoèenje/L
posvojitelj/I
potkazivanje/I
potkivaè/N
potkralj/M
potkrijepljen/J
povr¹/I
po¾rtvovanje/U
praksa/T
pravovjernost/S
preblag/V
preèaga/P
preformiranje/O
preinaèiti/F
prekidaè/N
prepisivanje/U
prespor/V
previranje/O
pre¾ivar/N
prigrabiti/F
prijavljivanje/U
prijevoz/L
primitak/R
pripomoæ/I
pritiskanje/T
probitaènost/S
prognoziranje/O
promjenljiv/V
pronala¾enje/U
pro¹iriti/F
prsten/G
pr¾ionica/P
pseudonim/L
putanja/T
racionalnost/S
Radau¹/K
rangiranje/O
rasko¹/I
rastavljiv/V
rastavljivost/R
ra¹lje/Q
Ratomir/H
razjasniti/F
razrje¹avanje/U
recitiranje/O
refren/L
relevantnost/S
rez/G
rið/W
rjeèca/P
robijanje/O
robija¹/N
roj/M
rola/T
rukovet/J
saæe/Q
saobraæaj/K
sapun/L
savjest/R
sedlarstvo/S
set/G
shvaæanje/O
sindikat/T
sintetizator/W
sipljiv/V
sjedenje/U
sjeveroistok/H
skupljaè/N
slamarica/P
slon/G
slo¾iti/F
sluèaj/M
smeð/W
smije¹tanje/O
Soèa/R
sol/I
solucija/S
spanaæ/K
sponzor/L
spot/G
sr¾/J
Stefan/H
stjecanje/O
stol/G
stric/K
stroj/M
stvrdnut/V
suèeljavanje/U
sudionica/P
sunce/T
suspenzija/S
svetitelj/N
svje¾/W
svojeglavost/R
svrhe/Q
¹al/G
¹eæeriti/F
¹kare/Q
¹pijun/L
¹pijuniranje/O
¹tit/G
tamnosmeð/W
Teksas/H
tip/G
tisovina/P
tolerancija/S
transformator/L
Trebeviæ/K
Trepèanin/T
trièavost/R
trijem/G
trke/Q
trnovit/V
tuð/W
tumaè/N
tu¾akanje/O
uèvr¹æivanje/U
ukljuèiti/F
urednost/S
Urugvaj/K
useljavanje/U
u¹kopiti/F
utopljenica/P
uzde/Q
u¾as/L
u¾e/R
Vakuf/H
va¹/W
veèer/I
velika¹/N
vest/J
vic/M
vlastit/V
voz/G
vraæanje/O
Vranje/S
zabluda/T
zabrinutost/R
zaèet/W
zadirkivanje/U
zagospodariti/F
zamjenica/P
zapad/H
zapovijed/J
za¹ao/F
zatvor/L
zmaj/M
Zorka/R
zvonjenje/U
¾drijeb/G
¾ivinarstvo/S
¾uè/I
¾ut/V
